California, session 20252026, AB533.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 32132.6 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:32132.6. (a) Notwithstanding Section 32132 or any other law, upon approval by its board of directors, a health care district may use the design-build procedure described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code to assign contracts for the construction of a building or improvements directly related to construction of a hospital or health facility building.(b) For purposes of this section, except where the context otherwise requires, all references in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code to “local agency” shall mean a health care district that owns or operates a hospital or clinic and its board of directors.(c) A hospital building project utilizing the design-build process authorized by subdivision (a) shall be reviewed and inspected in accordance with the standards and requirements of the Alfred E. Alquist Hospital Facilities Seismic Safety Act of 1983 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 129675) of Part 7 of Division 107).(d) Except as provided in this section, this section shall not be construed to affect the application of any other law.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.